Florida, session 2026, HB6003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (8) of section 768.21, Florida
Statutes, is amended, and subsections (3) and (4) of that
section are republished, to read:
768.21 Damages.—All potential beneficiaries of a recovery
for wrongful death, including the decedent's estate, shall be
identified in the complaint, and their relationships to the
decedent shall be alleged. Damages may be awarded as follows:
(3) Minor children of the decedent, and all children of
the decedent if there is no surviving spouse, may also recover
for lost parental companionship, instruction, and guidance and
for mental pain and suffering from the date of injury. For the
purposes of this subsection, if both spouses die within 30 days
of one another as a result of the same wrongful act or series of
acts arising out of the same incident, each spouse is considered
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6003 2026
to have been predeceased by the other.
(4) Each parent of a deceased minor child may also recover
for mental pain and suffering from the date of injury. Each
parent of an adult child may also recover for mental pain and
suffering if there are no other survivors.
(8) The damages specified in subsection (3) shall not be
recoverable by adult children and the damages specified in
subsection (4) shall not be recoverable by parents of an adult
child with respect to claims for medical negligence as defined
by s. 766.106(1).
Section 2. Subsection (9) of section 400.023, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
400.023 Civil enforcement.—
(9) An action under this part for a violation of rights or
negligence recognized herein is not a claim for medical
malpractice, and s. 768.21(8) does not apply to a claim alleging
death of the resident.
Section 3. Section 400.0235, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
400.0235 Certain provisions not applicable to actions
under this part.—An action under this part for a violation of
rights or negligence recognized under this part is not a claim
for medical malpractice, and the provisions of s. 768.21(8) do
not apply to a claim alleging death of the resident.
Section 4. Section 429.295, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6003 2026
to read:
429.295 Certain provisions not applicable to actions under
this part.—An action under this part for a violation of rights
or negligence recognized herein is not a claim for medical
malpractice, and the provisions of s. 768.21(8) do not apply to
a claim alleging death of the resident.
Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6003-00